Utah statutes.
76-10-805.   Carcass or offal -- Prohibitions relating to disposal --
Classification of offense.
Every person who puts the carcass of any dead animal, or the offal from any
slaughter pen, corral, or butcher shop into any river, creek, pond, street,
alley, or public highway, or road in common use, or who attempts to destroy it
by fire, within one-fourth of a mile of any city or town is guilty of a class
B misdemeanor.
